South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S668.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 54-3-10(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) There is created the South Carolina State Ports Authority. The governing body of the authority is a board of directors consisting of eleven members, nine voting members appointed by the Governor as provided in Section 54-3-20, the Secretary of Transportation, or his designee, and the Secretary of Commerce, or his designee. At least one of the nine voting members appointed by the Governor must be a resident of Berkeley, Charleston, or Dorchester County. The voting members shall be responsible for setting policies and direction for the authority so that the authority may achieve its mission. The powers and duties of the authority shall be exercised by the board. The board may delegate to one or more officers, agents, or employees such powers and duties as it determines are necessary and proper for the effective, efficient operation of the port. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on December 31, 2026. ----XX----